Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1238.01
Vessel equipped
with red or blue light; limitation on operation.

No
person other than a rescue squad member actually en route to, at, or returning
from any emergency requiring the services of such member or any peace officer in the performance
of his or her official duties shall operate a vessel equipped with a rotating
or flashing red or blue light or lights upon the waters of this state.

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 42;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 9.